South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S141.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 31, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 9 Firearm Liability Insurance Section 23-31-9010.  (A) A resident of this State who owns or possesses a firearm shall obtain and continuously maintain in full force and effect a homeowner's, renter's, or gun liability insurance policy that covers losses or damages resulting from any negligent or accidental use of the firearm including, but not limited to, death, injury, and property damage. Proof of insurance must be displayed upon demand by a law enforcement officer. (B) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be sentenced to not more than thirty days, fined one thousand dollars, or both. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----